Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.175

Adoption of rules.

The department shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW implementing and administering chapter 197, Laws of 1994. These rules are to include, but are not limited to:

(1) The application and calculation of actuarial value, with the agreement of the state actuary; and

(2) Establishing the minimum partial payment or the minimum units of restored service, or both.

[ 1994 c 197 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.